Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB92.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 66-1,178 is hereby amended to read as follows: 66-
1,178. (a) No electric utility may begin site preparation for or construction
of an electric transmission line, or exercise the right of eminent domain to
acquire any interest in land in connection with the site preparation for a
construction of any such line without first acquiring a siting permit from
the commission. Whenever any electric utility desires to obtain such a
permit, the utility shall file an application with the commission setting
forth therein that the utility proposes to construct an electric transmission
line and specifying:
(1) The proposed location thereof;
(2) the names and addresses of the landowners of record whose land
or interest therein is proposed to be acquired in connection with the
construction of or is located within 660 feet of the center line of the
easement where the line is proposed to be located; and
(3) such other information as may be required by the commission.
(b) Upon the filing of an application pursuant to subsection (a), the
commission shall fix a time for a public hearing on such application,
which shall be not more than 90 days after the date the application was
filed, to determine the necessity for and the reasonableness of the location
of the proposed electric transmission line. The commission shall fix the
place for hearing, which shall be in one of the counties through which the
electric transmission line is proposed to traverse.
(c) The commission may conduct an evidentiary hearing on an
application filed pursuant to this section at such time and place as the
commission deems appropriate.
(d) The commission shall issue a final order on the application within
120 180 days after the date the application was filed.
(e) It is the intent of the legislature that when a public utility files
an application for an electric transmission line siting permit pursuant

SB 92—Am. by HC 2
to this section, consistent with the commission's customary practices,
the commission shall:
(1) Issue a final order on such application in an expeditious
manner; and
(2) when circumstances allow, attempt to issue such final order in
a period of time that is less than the 180-day deadline to issue such
final order established pursuant to subsection (d).
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 66-1,178 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.